fst/morphology/stems/morph_derivation.lexc
LEXICON nanam-
nanam-/:nanam/ -aci "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/32 [1/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -ask1- "weight: 27.581325" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -askamik- "weight: 27.581325" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -htin1 "weight: 27.581325" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -iyaw- "weight: 27.581325" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -kât- "weight: 27.581325" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -paýi "weight: 17.615957" ; ! n=6/32 [14/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -piT "weight: 27.581325" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -pit "weight: 27.581325" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -sin1 "weight: 27.581325" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -skw1- "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=6/32 [1/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -spiton- "weight: 27.581325" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -tâpiskan- "weight: 26.888178" ; ! n=2/32 [0/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -têh- "weight: 27.581325" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -wê "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/32 [1/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -âpit- "weight: 27.581325" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -âskaci "weight: 26.888178" ; ! n=2/32 [0/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -âspinê "weight: 26.888178" ; ! n=2/32 [0/145429]
nanam-/:nanam/ -âstan "weight: 27.581325" ; ! n=1/32 [0/145429]

LEXICON nanihkât-
nanihkât-/:nanihkât/ -an1 "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
nanihkât-/:nanihkât/ -h "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=2/24 [0/145429]
nanihkât-/:nanihkât/ -ht2 "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=2/24 [0/145429]
nanihkât-/:nanihkât/ -i "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
nanihkât-/:nanihkât/ -isi "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/24 [1/145429]
nanihkât-/:nanihkât/ -m1 "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=2/24 [0/145429]
nanihkât-/:nanihkât/ -owê "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=2/24 [0/145429]
nanihkât-/:nanihkât/ -paýi "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/24 [1/145429]
nanihkât-/:nanihkât/ -âsp- "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
nanihkât-/:nanihkât/ -âspinê "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
nanihkât-/:nanihkât/ -êýi- "weight: 28.335097" ; ! n=4/24 [0/145429]
nanihkât-/:nanihkât/ -êýiht "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=2/24 [0/145429]
nanihkât-/:nanihkât/ -êýim "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=2/24 [0/145429]

LEXICON naniwat-
naniwat-/:naniwat/ -h "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]

LEXICON naniwêýat-
naniwêýat-/:naniwêýat/ -h "weight: 18.750937" ; ! n=3/7 [9/145429]
naniwêýat-/:naniwêýat/ -m1 "weight: 27.418806" ; ! n=2/7 [0/145429]
naniwêýat-/:naniwêýat/ -wê "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/7 [1/145429]

LEXICON nanwêýat-
nanwêýat-/:nanwêýat/ -h "weight: 19.407717" ; ! n=7/20 [2/145429]
nanwêýat-/:nanwêýat/ -ht4 "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=2/20 [0/145429]
nanwêýat-/:nanwêýat/ -isi "weight: 28.335097" ; ! n=4/20 [0/145429]
nanwêýat-/:nanwêýat/ -m1 "weight: 28.111953" ; ! n=5/20 [0/145429]
nanwêýat-/:nanwêýat/ -wê "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=2/20 [0/145429]

LEXICON nanânist-
nanânist-/:nanânist/ -iht "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/21 [1/145429]
nanânist-/:nanânist/ -ihtaw "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/21 [1/145429]
nanânist-/:nanânist/ -n1 "weight: 28.335097" ; ! n=4/21 [0/145429]
nanânist-/:nanânist/ -oht- "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/21 [0/145429]
nanânist-/:nanânist/ -ohtê "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/21 [0/145429]
nanânist-/:nanânist/ -paýi "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/21 [0/145429]
nanânist-/:nanânist/ -piT "weight: 28.622779" ; ! n=3/21 [0/145429]
nanânist-/:nanânist/ -pit "weight: 28.622779" ; ! n=3/21 [0/145429]
nanânist-/:nanânist/ ah- "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=2/21 [0/145429]
nanânist-/:nanânist/ ast- "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=2/21 [0/145429]
nanânist-/:nanânist/ astâ- "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/21 [0/145429]
nanânist-/:nanânist/ wêp- "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/21 [0/145429]

LEXICON nanâskw-
nanâskw-/:nanâskw/ -it "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=1/6 [4/145429]
nanâskw-/:nanâskw/ -m1 "weight: 17.652325" ; ! n=1/6 [81/145429]
nanâskw-/:nanâskw/ -mo "weight: 16.370020" ; ! n=4/6 [73/145429]

LEXICON nanâtaw1-
nanâtaw1-/:nanâtaw/ -h "weight: 14.226736" ; ! n=15/24 [166/145429]
nanâtaw1-/:nanâtaw/ -ht2 "weight: 18.463255" ; ! n=2/24 [18/145429]
nanâtaw1-/:nanâtaw/ -m1 "weight: 25.188792" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
nanâtaw1-/:nanâtaw/ -skaw1 "weight: 23.802498" ; ! n=4/24 [0/145429]
nanâtaw1-/:nanâtaw/ -âpoy "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/24 [2/145429]

LEXICON nanâtaw2-
nanâtaw2-/:nanâtaw/ -âp- "weight: 17.652325" ; ! n=3/6 [27/145429]
nanâtaw2-/:nanâtaw/ -âpaht "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/6 [3/145429]
nanâtaw2-/:nanâtaw/ -âpam "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/6 [1/145429]
nanâtaw2-/:nanâtaw/ -âpi "weight: 18.911280" ; ! n=1/6 [23/145429]

LEXICON nanâtohk-
nanâtohk-/:nanâtohk/ -isi "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]

LEXICON nanâtohkw-
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -ahkamik- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/31 [2/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -ahp- "weight: 26.831020" ; ! n=2/31 [0/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -ahpinê "weight: 26.831020" ; ! n=2/31 [0/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -ask1- "weight: 27.524167" ; ! n=1/31 [0/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -askân- "weight: 27.524167" ; ! n=1/31 [0/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -it "weight: 27.524167" ; ! n=1/31 [0/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -kwâT "weight: 19.156402" ; ! n=3/31 [6/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -kwâso "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=1/31 [6/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -kwât "weight: 26.137872" ; ! n=4/31 [0/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -kwâtê "weight: 26.831020" ; ! n=2/31 [0/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -m1 "weight: 26.831020" ; ! n=2/31 [0/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -n1 "weight: 26.425555" ; ! n=3/31 [0/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -naw "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/31 [1/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -nâkosi "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/31 [1/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -nâkwan "weight: 27.524167" ; ! n=1/31 [0/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -âhkôm "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/31 [2/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ -âpakwaniy "weight: 27.524167" ; ! n=1/31 [0/145429]
nanâtohkw-/:nanâtohkw/ ast- "weight: 26.831020" ; ! n=2/31 [0/145429]

LEXICON nanôsaw-
nanôsaw-/:nanôsaw/ -âpam "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]

LEXICON Initials
0 nanam- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=32/27654 [17/145429]
0 nanihkât- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=19/27654 [2/145429]
0 naniwat- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 naniwêýat- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=7/27654 [10/145429]
0 nanwêýat- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=18/27654 [2/145429]
0 nanânist- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=18/27654 [1/145429]
0 nanâskw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=6/27654 [158/145429]
0 nanâtaw1- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=22/27654 [182/145429]
0 nanâtaw2- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=3/27654 [27/145429]
0 nanâtohk- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 nanâtohkw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=22/27654 [11/145429]
0 nanôsaw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
LEXICON o2-
o2-/:o/ nanwêýat- "weight: 22.675615" ; ! n=2/392 [0/145429]
o2-/:o/ nanâtaw1- "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/392 [3/145429]
o2-/:o/ nanâtohkw- "weight: 23.368762" ; ! n=1/392 [0/145429]
